test/src/gt-norm-yamls/N-atim_gt-norm.yaml
Config:
  hfst:
    Gen: ../../../src/generator-gt-norm.hfst
    Morph: ../../../src/analyser-gt-norm.hfst
  xerox:
    Gen: ../../../src/generator-gt-norm.xfst
    Morph: ../../../src/analyser-gt-norm.xfst
    App: lookup

Tests:
  
  Noun - atim - ok : # -m animate noun
     atim+N+AN+Sg: atim # asdf
     atim+N+AN+Pl: atimwak #test
     atim+N+AN+Obv: atimwa
     atim+N+AN+Loc: atimohk # really rare form
     atim+N+AN+Der/Dim+N+AN+Sg: acimosis
     atim+N+AN+Der/Dim+N+AN+Pl: acimosisak
     atim+N+AN+Der/Dim+N+AN+Loc: acimosisihk
     
     atim+N+AN+Sg+Px1Sg: nitêm
     atim+N+AN+Sg+Px2Sg: kitêm
     atim+N+AN+Sg+Px3Sg+Obv: otêma
     atim+N+AN+Sg+Px3iSg+Obv: otêmiyiwa
     atim+N+AN+Sg+Px1Pl: nitêminân
     atim+N+AN+Sg+Px12Pl: kitêminaw
     atim+N+AN+Sg+Px2Pl: kitêmiwâw
     atim+N+AN+Sg+Px3Pl+Obv: otêmiwâwa
     atim+N+AN+Sg+Px3iPl+Obv: otêmiyiwa
     
     atim+N+AN+Pl+Px1Sg: nitêmak
     atim+N+AN+Pl+Px2Sg: kitêmak
     atim+N+AN+Pl+Px3Sg+Obv: otêma
     atim+N+AN+Pl+Px3iSg+Obv: otêmiyiwa
     atim+N+AN+Pl+Px1Pl: nitêminânak
     atim+N+AN+Pl+Px12Pl: kitêminawak
     atim+N+AN+Pl+Px2Pl: kitêmiwâwak
     atim+N+AN+Pl+Px3Pl+Obv: otêmiwâwa
     atim+N+AN+Pl+Px3iPl+Obv: otêmiyiwa
     
     atim+N+AN+Der/Dim+N+AN+Sg+Px1Sg: nicêmisis
     atim+N+AN+Der/Dim+N+AN+Sg+Px2Sg: kicêmisis
     atim+N+AN+Der/Dim+N+AN+Sg+Px3Sg+Obv: ocêmisisa
     atim+N+AN+Der/Dim+N+AN+Sg+Px3iSg+Obv: ocêmisisiyiwa
     atim+N+AN+Der/Dim+N+AN+Sg+Px1Pl: nicêmisisinân
     atim+N+AN+Der/Dim+N+AN+Sg+Px12Pl: kicêmisisinaw
     atim+N+AN+Der/Dim+N+AN+Sg+Px2Pl: kicêmisisiwâw
     atim+N+AN+Der/Dim+N+AN+Sg+Px3Pl+Obv: ocêmisisiwâwa
     
     atim+N+AN+Der/Dim+N+AN+Pl+Px1Sg: nicêmisisak
     atim+N+AN+Der/Dim+N+AN+Pl+Px2Sg: kicêmisisak
     atim+N+AN+Der/Dim+N+AN+Pl+Px3Sg+Obv: ocêmisisa
     atim+N+AN+Der/Dim+N+AN+Pl+Px3iSg+Obv: ocêmisisiyiwa
     atim+N+AN+Der/Dim+N+AN+Pl+Px1Pl: nicêmisisinânak
     atim+N+AN+Der/Dim+N+AN+Pl+Px12Pl: kicêmisisinawak
     atim+N+AN+Der/Dim+N+AN+Pl+Px2Pl: kicêmisisiwâwak
     atim+N+AN+Der/Dim+N+AN+Pl+Px3Pl+Obv: ocêmisisiwâwa
     atim+N+AN+Der/Dim+N+AN+Pl+Px3iPl+Obv: ocêmisisiyiwa
     
     atim+N+AN+Px1Sg+Loc: nitêmihk
     atim+N+AN+Px2Sg+Loc: kitêmihk
     atim+N+AN+Px3Sg+Loc: otêmihk
     atim+N+AN+Px3iSg+Loc: otêmiyihk
     atim+N+AN+Px1Pl+Loc: nitêminânihk
     atim+N+AN+Px12Pl+Loc: kitêminâhk
     atim+N+AN+Px2Pl+Loc: kitêmiwâwihk
     atim+N+AN+Px3Pl+Loc: otêmiwâwihk # otêmiwâw-ihk
     atim+N+AN+Px3iPl+Loc: otêmiyihk  # otêmiyiw-ihk?
     
     atim+N+AN+Der/Dim+N+AN+Px1Sg+Loc: nicêmisisihk
     atim+N+AN+Der/Dim+N+AN+Px2Sg+Loc: kicêmisisihk
     atim+N+AN+Der/Dim+N+AN+Px3Sg+Loc: ocêmisisihk
     atim+N+AN+Der/Dim+N+AN+Px3iSg+Loc: ocêmisisiyihk
     atim+N+AN+Der/Dim+N+AN+Px1Pl+Loc: nicêmisisinânihk
     atim+N+AN+Der/Dim+N+AN+Px12Pl+Loc: kicêmisisinâhk
     atim+N+AN+Der/Dim+N+AN+Px2Pl+Loc: kicêmisisiwâwihk
     atim+N+AN+Der/Dim+N+AN+Px3Pl+Loc: ocêmisisiwâwihk
     atim+N+AN+Der/Dim+N+AN+Px3iPl+Loc: ocêmisisiyihk # ocêmisisiwâwihk ?
